Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.180

Compensation of nonlicensed person—Penalties.

It shall be unlawful for a licensed auctioneer or licensed auction company to pay compensation in money or otherwise to anyone not licensed under this chapter to render any service or to do any act forbidden under this chapter to be rendered or performed except by licensees. The department may fine any person who violates this section five hundred dollars for the first offense and one thousand dollars for the second or subsequent offense. Furthermore, the violation of this section by any licensee shall be, in the discretion of the department, sufficient cause for taking any actions listed under RCW 18.235.110.

[ 2002 c 86 s 210; 1986 c 324 s 14; 1982 c 205 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.